Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202214-563
City funds; authorized investments.

Notwithstanding any provision of a home rule charter, funds of a city of the metropolitan class available for such purpose may be invested in securities of the United States, the State of Nebraska, the city, a county in which such city is located, in the securities of municipally owned and operated public utility property and plants of such city, or in the same manner as funds of the State of Nebraska are invested, except that the city treasurer may purchase certificates of deposit from and make time deposits in banks, capital stock financial institutions, or qualifying mutual financial institutions selected as depositories of city funds. Section 77-2366 shall apply to deposits in capital stock financial institutions. Section 77-2365.01 shall apply to deposits in qualifying mutual financial institutions.

Laws 1921, c. 116, art. IV, § 52, p. 493;

C.S.1922, § 3678;

C.S.1929, § 14-555;

R.S.1943, § 14-563;

Laws 1987, LB 440, § 1;

Laws 1989, LB 33, § 10;

Laws 2001, LB 362, § 11;

Laws 2022, LB800, § 208.
July 21, 2022
Surplus funds, investment, see section 77-2341.